Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.200

Service and fee limitations by health care purchasers—Pilot projects.

All state health care purchasers shall have the authority to set service and fee limitations on chiropractic costs. The health care authority shall establish pilot projects in defined geographic regions of the state to contract with organizations of chiropractors for a prepaid capitated amount.

[ 1992 c 241 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—1992 c 241: See note following RCW 18.25.005.